Hawaii statutes.
[§76-28.5] Temporary
employment in state positions. (a) No department or agency of the State
shall temporarily employ the same person in the same position that is wholly
funded by general funds for more than two terms of eighty-nine days; provided
that with the approval of the governor, a department or agency of the State may
temporarily employ the same person in the same position for eight terms of
eighty-nine days within a consecutive twenty-four-month period.

(b) This section shall not apply to periods of
temporary employment when a person has been appointed to a vacant position
arising as a result of:

(1) A workers' compensation claim;

(2) Medical leave;

(3) An ongoing investigation;

(4) A shortage category;

(5) A working condition differential;

(6) A remote geographical location;

(7) A seasonal demand for employees;

(8) A leave of absence taken by an incumbent who has
return rights;

(9) A need to fill a department of education position
for the delivery of special education services; or

(10) A position pending reorganization.

(c) This section shall not apply to the
counties. [L 2016, c 246, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next